Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.020

Duties of superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall have the power and duty (1) to prescribe rules governing the administration, control, terms, conditions, and disbursements of allotments to school districts to assist them in providing school plant facilities; (2) to approve allotments to districts that apply for state assistance whenever such action is advisable; (3) to authorize the payment of approved allotments by warrant of the state treasurer; and (4) in the event that the amount of state assistance applied for exceeds the funds available for such assistance during any biennium, to make allotments on the basis of the urgency of need for school facilities in the districts that apply for assistance and/or to prorate allotments among such districts in conformity with applicable procedures and rules.

[ 2006 c 263 s 301; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.060. Prior: 1947 c 278 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4940-13. Formerly RCW 28A.47.060, 28.47.060.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.